DI-44

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XA-01

DTC

C 1207 / 37 Neutral Start Switch Circuit
(P/R Range)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No.

DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

C1207/37

Whenany ofthefollowing  1.through 3. is detected:

1.Atvehiclespeedof 15km/h (9 mph)orlessandthe
conditions that open circuit signal of P signal circuit of
neutral start switch is ON and the voltage of IG 1 termipal
is9.5Vto 17V continuefor5sec.ormore.

2.Atvehiclespeedof  15km/h (9 mph) ormore, andwhen
the conditionthat P signalfrom neutral start switch is * Neutral start switch
ON, andthe the shiftlever position information fromthe « Neutral start switch circuit (P/R range)
engine and ECT ECU is other than in P or N range con-
tinues for 60 sec. or more.

3.Atvehiclespeedof 15km/h (9mph)orlessandthe
conditions that open circuit signal of P signal circuit of
neutral start switch is ON and the voltage of IG 1 termipal
is9.5Vto 17V continuefor5sec.ormore.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-45

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

WIRING DIAGRAM
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DI-46

DIAGNOSTICS ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-47
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check neutral start switch (P/R range).

PREPARATION:
(@) Jack up the vehicle.
(o) Disconnect the neutral start switch connector.
AT PN CHECK.:
f @Eiﬁ Check continuity between each terminal shown below when the
L olols] J shift lever is moved to each range.
OK:
P range Terminals 1 - 3 Continuity
F 10001 R range Terminals2 -3 Continuity

NG> Replace neutral start switch.

@

2 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between terminals P
and R of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and battery (See page IN-35).

@

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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